Idaho, session 2025, S1093.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-143, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-143. ADULT ALTERNATIVE INSTRUCTIONAL DIPLOMA PROGRAM. (1) The
adult alternative instructional diploma program is hereby established for
the purpose of assisting adults twenty-one (21) years of age or older in
obtaining a high school diploma and developing employability and career
technical skills.
(2) For the purpose of this section:
(a) "Accredited" means holding an active accreditation recognized by
the state board of education.
(b) "Career pathways coursework" means one (1) or more courses that
help a student enter or advance within a specific occupation or occupa-
tional cluster.
(c) "Employability skills certification" means a certificate earned
by demonstrating professional, nontechnical skills through assessment
and shall include but not be limited to the program standards of the
United States department of labor's "skills to pay the bills: mastering
soft skills for workplace success" program.
(d) "High school diploma" means a diploma issued by an accredited in-
stitution. A diploma issued pursuant to the provisions of this section
is recognized as a secondary school diploma by the state of Idaho.
(e) "Qualified provider" means a public, nonprofit, or other entity
that meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. A qual-
ified provider may not receive funding for a student under this section
if the qualified provider receives federal or state funding or private
tuition for that student.
(f) "Student" means a participant in the adult alternative instruc-
tional diploma program who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older, who
is a resident of Idaho, and who has not yet earned a high school diploma.


(g) "Workforce credential" means a third-party credential that either
is part of a sequence of credentials that can be accumulated over time to
build an individual's qualifications to advance along a career pathway
and results in a certificate or verifies an individual's qualification
or competence and that is issued by a third party with the relevant au-
thority to issue such credential.
(3) On or before August 1, a prospective qualified provider shall file
an application with the state board of education, on a form prescribed by the
state board of education, that includes all information required under the
provisions of this subsection. After the state board of education verifies
that the applicant meets the criteria established in this subsection, it
shall approve the applicant as a qualified provider. The state board of edu-
cation shall publish and maintain a list of all such qualified providers, and
shall announce the qualified providers no later than August 31. Qualified
providers that do not meet minimum standards for two (2) consecutive years
shall be removed for the approved list. Qualified providers for adult alter-
native instructional programs include public, nonprofit, or other qualified
entities that:
(a) Are regionally accredited entities that grant high school diplo-
mas;
(b) Have a minimum of two (2) years of experience providing adult
dropout recovery services;
(c) Have the ability to:
(i) Provide academic skills intake assessments and transcript
evaluations;
(ii) Develop a learning plan for each student that integrates
course and credit requirements for graduation and career goals;
(iii) Provide remediation opportunities in literacy and numeracy;
(iv) Provide an employability skills certification;
(v) Provide career pathways coursework; and
(vi) Provide preparation for workforce credentials; and
(d) Have a minimum of fifty percent (50%) graduation rate for each two-
year cohort of students served.
(4)(a) The state board of education shall reimburse qualified
providers an amount equal to seven hundred thirty-three dollars ($733)
for each credit of high school instruction provided by such qualified
providers and completed by a student.
(b) After twelve (12) consecutive months, each qualified provider
shall provide the following data outcomes to the state board of educa-
tion:
(i) The average number of credits needed to meet state course and
credit requirements for graduation upon enrollment;
(ii) The average number of credits earned by students enrolled
within a twelve (12) month period; and
(iii) The average number of credits earned by students who meet the
state graduation course and credit requirements within a twelve
(12) month period.
(5) On or before February 1 of the second fiscal year of the program,
qualified providers shall report the following required information to the
state board of education:


(a) The total number of students for whom the qualified provider has re-
ceived payments;
(b) The total number of credits earned by students for whom the quali-
fied provider is receiving payments; and
(c) The total number of students for whom the qualified provider is re-
ceiving payments who received high school diplomas.
(6) The state board of education shall promulgate rules, subject to
legislative approval, to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 9, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-919, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-919. ADULT ALTERNATIVE INSTRUCTIONAL DIPLOMA PROGRAM FUND. (1)
There is hereby created in the state treasury the adult alternative instruc-
tional diploma program fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used to create a
pilot program for the issuance of accredited high school diplomas for adults
twenty-one (21) years of age or older pursuant to section 33-143, Idaho Code.
(2) Moneys in the fund shall be subject to legislative appropriation
and shall consist of:
(a) Legislative transfers and appropriations; and
(b) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.